Wyoming statutes. Title 14 Children
Article 4. Child Protection Act
§ 14-3-431.
Duration of orders of disposition; termination of orders; permanency hearings; petition for termination of parental rights.

An order of disposition shall remain in force for an indefinite period until terminated by the court whenever it appears the purpose of the order has been achieved and it is in the child’s best interest that he be discharged from further court jurisdiction.

Unless sooner terminated by court order, all orders issued under this act shall terminate with respect to a child adjudicated neglected, when he reaches eighteen (18) years of age unless the court has ordered care or services to continue beyond that time. The court shall conduct a review hearing at least six (6) months before the child reaches eighteen (18) years of age to determine whether care or transitional services should continue and for what period of time prior to the individual reaching the age of twenty-one (21) years.

The court shall conduct a review hearing six (6) months from the date of the child’s removal from the home and every six (6) months thereafter. If the child is placed in a qualified residential treatment program, the department of family services shall present to the court at the six (6) month review hearing the information required under subparagraphs (j)(iii)(A) through (D) of this section. At the six (6) month review hearing the court shall review the case plan to determine:

The health and safety of the child;

The continuing necessity for the placement;

The appropriateness of the current placement;

The reasonableness of efforts made to reunify the family and the consistency of those efforts with the case plan;

The appropriateness of the case plan and the extent of compliance with the case plan including the permanent placement of the child;

If progress has been made toward alleviating or mitigating the causes necessitating placement outside the home and the extent of that progress; and

The date the child is expected to be returned to the home or placed for adoption or legal guardianship.

The court shall conduct a permanency hearing no later than twelve (12) months from the date of the child’s removal from the home and not less than once every twelve (12) months thereafter if the child remains in out-of-home placement or more frequently as deemed necessary by the court.

If the court determines as provided in W.S. 14-2-309(a)(vi), (b) or (c) that reasonable efforts to preserve and reunify the family are not required, a permanency hearing shall be held for the child within thirty (30) days after the determination.

At the permanency hearing, the court shall make determinations of reasonable efforts as outlined in W.S.

14-3-440

.

A permanency hearing is not required if the case was dismissed, the child was not removed from the home or the child was returned to the child’s parent or guardian.

The permanency hearing may be combined with a hearing required by other sections of this chapter if the hearing is held within twelve (12) months from the date of the child’s removal from the home. If a permanency hearing is combined with another hearing, the requirements of the court related to the disposition of the other hearing shall be met in addition to the requirements of this section.

At the permanency hearing, the department of family services shall present to the court:

Efforts made to:

Effectuate the permanency plan for the child, address the options for the child’s permanent placement, examine the reasons for excluding other permanency options and set forth the proposed plan to carry out the placement decision, including specific times for achieving the permanency plan; and

Ensure the child be provided, to the greatest extent possible, the opportunity to participate in age appropriate or developmentally appropriate activities and experiences as defined in W.S.

14-13-101

(a)(i) to promote healthy child and adolescent development consistent with W.S.

14-13-101

through

14-13-104

.

If the permanency plan is classified as another planned permanent living arrangement:

A compelling reason for establishing another planned permanent living arrangement; and

Documentation of the ongoing and unsuccessful efforts to return the child home, place the child for adoption or with a legal guardian or a fit and willing relative for purposes of guardianship or adoption, including evidence of efforts to use social media or other search technology to find biological family members for the child.

If the child is placed in a qualified residential treatment program:

Information to show that ongoing assessment of the child’s strengths and needs continues to support the determination that placement in a qualified residential treatment program provides the most effective and appropriate level of care for the child in the least restrictive environment consistent with the short-term and long-term goals of the child and the child’s permanency plan;

The specific treatment needs that will be met for the child in the placement;

The length of time the child is expected to remain in the placement;

The efforts made by the department of family services to prepare the child to return home or be placed for adoption or legal guardianship.

At the permanency hearing, the court shall:

Determine whether the permanency plan is in the best interest of the child and whether the department of family services has made reasonable efforts to finalize the plan;

Order the department of family services to take any additional steps necessary to effectuate the terms of the permanency plan;

Ask the child about his desired permanency outcome if it is determined that the child should be present at the hearing;

Ask the child’s guardian ad litem or other legal representative about the child’s desired permanency outcome if it is determined inappropriate for the child to be present at the hearing;

If the permanency plan is classified as another planned permanent living arrangement:

Make a judicial determination and explain why, as of the date of the hearing, another planned permanent living arrangement is the best permanency plan for the child; and

Provide reasons why it continues not to be in the best interest of the child to return home or be placed for adoption or with a legal guardian or a fit and willing relative for purposes of guardianship or adoption.

Require that the child be provided, to the greatest extent possible, the opportunity to participate in age appropriate or developmentally appropriate activities and experiences as defined in W.S.

14-13-101

(a)(i) to promote healthy child and adolescent development consistent with W.S.

14-13-101

through

14-13-104

.

When a child has been placed in foster care under the responsibility of the state for fifteen (15) of the most recent twenty-two (22) months the state shall file a petition to terminate parental rights or seek to be joined as a party to the petition if a petition has been filed by another party, unless:

The child is in the care of a relative;

The state agency has documented in the case plan a compelling reason for determining that filing the petition is not in the best interest of the child; or

The state agency has not provided services to the child’s family deemed to be necessary for the safe return of the child to the home, if reasonable efforts described in W.S.

14-3-440

are required to be made.

Concurrently with the filing of a petition under subsection (m) of this section, the state agency shall identify, recruit, process and approve a qualified family for adoption of the child.

A petition to terminate parental rights shall be filed within sixty (60) days of a judicial determination that reasonable efforts to reunify the child and parent are not required pursuant to W.S. 14-2-309(a)(vi), (b) or (c).

A termination of parental rights hearing shall be held within ninety (90) days of the filing of the termination petition unless continued by the court for good cause shown.

At each of the review hearings, the court shall enter findings on the record pursuant to subsection (c) of this section.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 1998, ch. 44, § 1; 1999, ch. 4, § 1; 2001, ch. 61, § 2; 2004, ch. 127, § 2; 2005, ch. 201, § 1; 2016 ch. 95, § 2, effective March 4, 2016; 2020 ch. 2, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (b), substituted “unless the court has ordered care or services to continue beyond that time. The court shall conduct a review hearing at least six (6) months before the child reaches eighteen (18) years of age to determine whether care or transitional services should continue and for what period of time prior to the individual reaching the age of twenty-one (21) years” for “or has graduated from high school”; and added (g).

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote the introductory language in (c) to provide for a review hearing once every six months rather than once every 12 months; added (d) through (k), redesignating former (d) and (e) as (m) and (n); and added (o), redesignating former (f) and (g) as (p) and (q).

The 2016 amendment

rewrote (j) and added (j)(i)(A), (j)(i)(B),
(j)(ii)(A), and (j)(ii)(B), and rewrote (k) and added (k)(i) through (k)(iv), (k)(v)A) and (k)(v)(B), and (k)(vi).

Laws 2016, ch. 95, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8, Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 4, 2016.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (c), added the second sentence; and added (j)(iii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-3-402(a)(xxiv).

Due process. —

After the juvenile court issued an order that authorized removal of neglected children from their mother's custody without a subsequent order, the mother's due process rights were not violated by removing the children without first conducting an evidentiary hearing. She had notice and a meaningful opportunity to be heard at the review hearing.
RH v. State (In the Interest of DRS), 2011 WY 128, 261 P.3d 697,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 2011).

In Wyoming dependency/neglect proceedings, due process requires that if a change in a permanency plan includes adoption or permanent placement other than reunification, parents must have the right to request, and on request must be provided with, an evidentiary hearing, and a parent must request the hearing if he or she desires one, because there may be instances in which parents do not dispute a recommendation or are content with a non-evidentiary hearing, so the failure to request such a hearing waives that right. KC v. State (In the Interest of GC), 2015 WY 73, 351 P.3d 236,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 2015).

Hearing on change in goal of a permanency plan from reunification to adoption did not violate a mother's due process rights because (1) the mother did not seek a hearing or directly claim the hearing held violated due process, and (2) lack of a full evidentiary hearing was not plain error, as such a right was not clear at the time of the hearing, since Wyo. R. Evid. 1101(b)(3) said the rules of evidence only applied to juvenile adjudicatory hearings. KC v. State (In the Interest of GC), 2015 WY 73, 351 P.3d 236,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 2015).

Juvenile court properly changed the permanency plan for a mother's child from family reunification to termination and adoption because, while the delays in holding review hearings were unacceptable and contrary to the child's best interests, the mother waived her due process and other claims relating to the change in permanency from reunification to adoption when she advocated a permanency goal of adoption, the Child Protection Act did not require that the permanency order include findings regarding the merits of prospective adoption applicants or that the order give effect to the mother's adoption preference, and determination of the adoptive parent(s) was a matter for a separate proceeding. DM v. State (In re L-MHB), 2017 WY 110, 401 P.3d 949,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 2017).

Revocation of consent decree. —

Revocation of consent decree. —

Court erred
by revoking a consent decree in the neglect case because, although
the court did not lose jurisdiction when the court was empowered
to
conduct a hearing and rule on the accusations, the court erred
in
concluding that the Mother violated the terms of the consent decree
by drinking alcohol when the consent decree agreement did not expressly
prohibit Mother from drinking but only required her to undergo alcohol/substance
abuse evaluation and follow the regimen of treatment recommended.
MR v. State (In the Interest of CDR), 2015 WY 79, 351 P.3d 264,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(Wyo. 2015).

Commencement of termination proceedings. —

Commencement of termination proceedings. —

Termination of a mother's parental rights was not invalidated due to a decision not to place children with their maternal grandmother because the placement decision did not affect the mother's ability to visit the children or strengthen a relationship with them; moreover, that placement was unsuitable due to the grandmother's failure to cooperate and the fact that she lived with a convicted sex offender. In addition, the Wyoming Department of Family Services was not required to wait for a second home evaluation for the grandmother after she moved to a different state before commencing termination proceedings against the mother.
K.H. v. Wyo. Dep't of Family Servs. (In re D.H.), 2007 WY 196, 173 P.3d 365,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 208

(Wyo. 2007).

Order changing a mother’s permanency plan from family reunification to termination of her rights and adoption was reversed because the record established that the Wyoming Department of Family Services failed to prove by a preponderance of the evidence that it made reasonable efforts to reunify the mother with the children. JR v. State (In the Int. of MA), 2022 WY 29, 505 P.3d 179,

2022 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 2022).

Authorized agency. —

Department of Family Services (DFS), a public social service agency,
Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 9-2-2101(a), with authority to oversee the custody and care of children in cases of abuse and neglect under the Child Protection Act,
Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

14-3-401

through

14-3-441

, was an “authorized agency” under
Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

14-2-308

and

14-2-310

with authority to file a petition to terminate a mother's parental rights, even though DFS did not have custody of the children.
State v. DH (In the Interest of LB), 2014 WY 10, 316 P.3d 1184,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 2014).

Presence of children.—

While this
section clearly required the juvenile court to determine whether
the
children should be present at the permanency hearing, the juvenile
court made the required determination at the end of the hearing and
the statute did not expressly require that the decision be made prior
to the hearing DT v. State, 2017 WY 36, 391 P.3d 1136,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 2017).

Residual parental rights.—

Mother’s claim that a permanency order should have designated her preferred adoptive parents as the court-ordered adoptive parents had not been waived, but failed on the merits where the permanency order had not terminated the mother’s parental rights or changed legal custody, and nothing in
Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 14-3-431(k) (2017) required findings as to the merits of the prospective adoption applicants.
DM v. State (In re L-MHB), 2017 WY 110, 401 P.3d 949,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 2017).

Mother’s claim that a permanency order should have designated the her preferred adoptive parents as the court-ordered adoptive parents had not been waived, but failed on the merits where the permanency order had not terminated the mother’s parental rights or changed legal custody, and nothing in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 14-3-431(k) (2017) required findings as to the merits of the prospective adoption applicants. DM v. State (In re L-MHB), 2017 WY 110, 401 P.3d 949,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 2017).

Sufficiency of evidence. —

Sufficient
evidence supported a trial court's decisions to change the goal of
a permanency plan from reunification to adoption because a child's
mother did not comply with the mother's case plan. KC v. State (In the Interest of GC), 2015 WY 73, 351 P.3d 236,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 2015).

It was not an abuse of discretion to alter a father’s sons’ permanency plan from reunification to termination of parental rights and adoption because sufficient evidence showed the Wyoming Department of Family Services (DFS) made reasonable reunification efforts, but those efforts were unsuccessful when the father (1) refused to cooperate with DFS or utilize rehabilitation programs available to the father while incarcerated, (2) engaged in misconduct limiting the father’s ability to have contact with the sons, and (3) then communicated with the sons only sporadically. TW v. State (In re JW), 2018 WY 22, 411 P.3d 422,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2018).

Termination of parental rights was proper. —

There was sufficient evidence to support the finding that termination of a mother's parental rights, rather than reunification, was in the best interest of her children under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 14-3-431(k) because she failed to improve her parenting skills despite 14 months of sustained assistance; she had irregular attendance and lack of engagement at visitations.
JO v. State, Dep't of Family Servs. (In the Interest of RE), 2011 WY 170, 267 P.3d 1092,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 174

(Wyo. 2011).

Juvenile court properly found that the state had made reasonable efforts to reunify the family because the mother and the father had multiple opportunities, and over two years to sort out their issues and comply with the case plan, by the end of the two-year period, both parents were incarcerated, both continued to use drugs, both struggled with their mental health, housing, and employment, and both admitted to needing more time to comply with the plan. TD v. State (In the Interest of SMD), 2022 WY 24, 503 P.3d 644,

2022 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 2022).

Quoted

in

Jet v. State (In re Drt), 2010 WY 137, 241 P.3d 489,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Oct. 21, 2010).

Cited

in

LW v. State (In the Interest of JW), 2010 WY 28, 226 P.3d 873,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Mar. 18, 2010); SAS v. Dep't of Family Servs. (In re AGS), 2014 WY 143,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Nov. 7, 2014).

HP v. State, 2004 WY 82, 93 P.3d 982,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(2004).

Jurisdiction.—

Juvenile court’s jurisdiction lapsed on a child’s 18th birthday because the juvenile court made the required findings over three months after the child turned 18; necause the juvenile court’s failure to address the procedural requirement deprived it of jurisdiction over the child, its belated order that its jurisdiction would continue until either an adult guardianship was in place or the child turned 21 was without effect. RH v. State (In the Interest of BG), 2019 WY 116, 451 P.3d 1161,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 2019).

Grandparents' motion denied.—

Juvenile court
did not make an unreasonable decision in denying the grandparents'
motion seeking to transfer placement of their grandchild from the
foster parents to the grandparents; the child had been in the foster
parents' care approximately two and a half years, testimony indicated
that changing placement could be detrimental to her, the juvenile
court correctly concluded that the best interests of the child were
paramount, and the juvenile court's reasoning was in accord with the
statute governing permanency hearings. PM v. State (In the Interest of SO), 2016 WY 99, 382 P.3d 51,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 2016).

Stated

in

E.R.C.K. v. State Dep't of Family Servs., 2013 WY 160, 314 P.3d 1170,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Dec 24, 2013).

§ 14-3-432.
Appeal; right generally; transcript provided; cost thereof.

Any party including the state may appeal any final order, judgment or decree of the juvenile court to the supreme court within the time and in the manner provided by the Wyoming Rules of Appellate Procedure.

Upon motion of the child’s parents, guardian or custodian, supported by affidavit stating they are financially unable to purchase a transcript of the proceeding, a transcript or so much thereof necessary to support the appeal shall be provided at no cost or at a cost the court determines they are able to pay. Any cost of the transcript not charged to the appellant shall be certified by the court to the county treasurer and paid from the funds of the county in which the proceedings were held.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1.

Order in Child Neglect Proceeding Constituted Final Appealable Order. —

Juvenile court’s order in the prior neglect proceedings was a final, appealable order under the Child Protection Act and the Wyoming Rules of Appellate Procedure, and constituted a judgment, the collateral attack of which generally was disallowed; thus, the mother could not collaterally attack the order in the prior neglect proceedings on appeal under the guise of appealing the district court’s order terminating her parental rights. Reed v. State (In re Parental Rights To AM-LR), 2018 WY 76, 421 P.3d 551,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Wyo. 2018).

§ 14-3-433.
Stay of orders pending appeal; securing of payment; staying transfer of legal custody.

If an appeal is taken, an order to pay a fine, costs, support for a child, restitution or any order for the payment of money may be stayed by the juvenile court or by the supreme court pending appeal. The court may require the appellant to deposit with the clerk of court the whole or any part of the payment ordered, to give bond for the payment thereof or any other terms and conditions to secure payment upon final determination of the appeal as the court deems proper. The court may also issue any appropriate order to restrain the appellant from dissipating his assets pending appeal.

Either the juvenile court or the supreme court may stay an order transferring legal custody of a child to a person, agency, organization or institution other than his parents, guardian or former custodian, provided that suitable provision is made for the shelter care of the child pending the appeal.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1.

§ 14-3-434.
Fees, costs and expenses.

There is no fee for filing a petition under this act nor shall any state, county or local law enforcement officer charge a fee for service of process under this act. Witness fees, juror fees and travel expenses in the amounts allowable by law may be paid to persons other than the parties who are subpoenaed or required to appear at any hearing pursuant to this act.

The following costs and expenses, when approved and certified by the court to the county treasurer, shall be a charge upon the funds of the county where the proceedings are held and shall be paid by the board of county commissioners of that county:

Witness fees and travel expense;

Jury fees, costs and travel expense;

Costs of service of process or notice by certified mail;

Costs of any physical or mental examinations or treatment ordered by the court;

Reasonable compensation for services and costs of counsel appointed by the court;

Reasonable compensation for services and costs of a guardian ad litem appointed by the court, unless the county participates in the guardian ad litem program pursuant to W.S.

14-12-101

through

14-12-104

and the program was appointed to provide the guardian ad litem; and

Any other costs of the proceedings which would be assessable as costs in the district court.

In every case in which a guardian ad litem has been appointed to represent the child under this act or in which counsel has been appointed under this act to represent the child’s parents, guardian or custodian, the court shall determine whether the child’s parents, guardian, custodian or other person responsible for the child’s support is able to pay part or all of the costs of representation and shall enter specific findings on the record. If the court determines that any of the parties is able to pay any amount as reimbursement for costs of representation, the court shall order reimbursement or shall state on the record the reasons why reimbursement was not ordered. The court may also in any case order that all or any part of the costs and expenses enumerated in paragraphs (b)(i), (iii), (iv) and (vii) of this section, be reimbursed to the county by the child’s parents or any person legally obligated for his support, or any of them jointly and severally, upon terms the court may direct. An order for reimbursement of costs made pursuant to this subsection may be enforced as provided in W.S.

14-3-435

. Any reimbursement ordered for guardian ad litem services provided pursuant to W.S.

14-12-101

through

14-12-104

shall be apportioned between the county and the guardian ad litem program in accordance with payments made for those services.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 2012, ch. 76, § 3.

The 2012 amendment,

in (b)(vi), inserted “unless the county participates in the guardian ad litem program pursuant to W.S.

14-12-101

through

14-12-104

and the program was appointed to provide the guardian ad litem”; and in (c), added the last sentence.

Laws 2012, ch. 76 § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2012.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-3-402(a)(xxiv).

§ 14-3-435.
Ordering payment for support and treatment of child; how paid; enforcement.

When legal custody of a child, other than temporary guardianship, is vested by court order in an individual, agency, institution or organization other than the child’s parents, the court shall in the same or any subsequent proceeding inquire into the financial condition of the child’s parents or any other person who may be legally obligated to support the child. After due notice and hearing the court shall order the parents or any other legally obligated person to pay a reasonable sum for the support and treatment of the child during the time that a dispositional order is in force. The requirements of W.S.

20-2-101

through

20-2-406

apply to this section. The amount of support shall be determined in accordance with the presumptive child support established by W.S.

20-2-304

. In any case where the court has deviated from the presumptive child support, the reasons therefor shall be specifically set forth in the order. The amount ordered to be paid shall be paid to the clerk of the juvenile court for transmission to the person, institution or agency having legal custody of the child or to whom compensation is due. The clerk of court is authorized to receive periodic payments payable in the name or for the benefit of the child, including but not limited to social security, veteran’s administration benefits or insurance annuities, and apply the payments as the court directs. An order for support under this subsection shall include a statement of the addresses and social security numbers if known, of each obligor, the names and addresses of each obligor’s employer and the names and birth dates of each child to whom the order relates. The court shall order each obligor to notify the clerk of court in writing within fifteen (15) days of any change in address or employment. If any person who is legally obligated to support the child does not have full time employment, the court may require that person to seek full time employment and may require community service work in lieu of payment until full time employment is obtained.

An order for the payment of money entered against a parent or other person legally obligated to support a child under the provisions of W.S.

14-3-434

,

20-2-101

through

20-2-406

or this section shall be entered separately from the decree of disposition under W.S.

14-3-429

and shall not be treated as a part of the confidential court record under W.S.

14-3-437

. The order may be filed in the district court of any county in the state. From the time of filing, the order shall have the same effect as a judgment or decree of the district court in a civil action and may be enforced by the district attorney, or the department of family services in the same manner and with the same powers as in other child support cases under W.S.

20-2-303

,

20-2-304

,

20-2-307

,

20-2-311

,

20-2-401

through

20-2-406

and

20-6-101

through

20-6-222

, or in any manner provided by law for enforcement of a civil judgment for money.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 2000, ch. 1, § 1; ch. 34, § 3; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 70, § 2; 2018 ch. 42, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (b), substituted “ W.S.

20-2-303

,

20-2-304

,

20-2-307

” for “ W.S.

20-2-303

through

20-2-305

,

20-2-307

.”

§ 14-3-436.
Proceedings deemed in equity.

All proceedings under this act shall be regarded as proceedings in equity and the court shall have and exercise equitable jurisdiction.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-3-402(a)(xxiv).

§ 14-3-437.
Records and reports confidential; inspection.

Throughout proceedings pursuant to this act the court shall safeguard the records from disclosure. Upon completion of the proceedings, whether or not there is an adjudication, the court shall order the entire file, except for child support orders, and record of the proceeding sealed and the court shall not release these records except to the extent necessary to meet the following inquiries:

From another court of law;

From an agency preparing a presentence report for another court;

From a party to the proceeding;

From the department of family services for purposes of establishing, modifying or enforcing a support obligation.

Upon receipt of inquiries as set out in this section, the court may release a copy of the presentence investigation report together with a cover letter stating the disposition of the proceeding.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 2000, ch. 1, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-3-402(a)(xxiv).

§ 14-3-438.
Liability for contempt; penalties.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the court upon its own motion or upon the motion of the district or county attorney, or guardian ad litem, may find that the child’s parent, parents, or guardian or any other person who willfully violates, or neglects or refuses to obey or perform any order or provision of this act is liable for contempt of court and may be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00) or incarcerated not more than ninety (90) days, or both.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-3-402(a)(xxiv).

Due process requirements not met. —

Adjudication of neglect under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

14-3-402

et seq., the Wyoming Child Protection Act, was entered against defendant for not providing adequate care necessary for the well-being of his minor children; the juvenile court ordered defendant to satisfy certain requirements within a specified period of time. Because the contempt proceeding under pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

14-3-438

against defendant was not conducted as an independent criminal action apart from the underlying juvenile case as required by Wyo. R. Crim. P. 42(c), with its own caption and docket number, the juvenile court never acquired jurisdiction to proceed; its judgment and sentence of contempt was null and void.
BD v. State, 2010 WY 18, 226 P.3d 272,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 2010).

Defendant's due process right to notice of criminal contempt charges was violated because (1) an order to show cause gave no adequate notice of the terms of the order defendant allegedly violated or defendant's alleged conduct constituting some violations, and (2) the error was compounded by a refusal to give defendant's counsel access to the juvenile court file containing the underlying order. Brown v. State, 2017 WY 45, 393 P.3d 1265,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 2017).

Concurrent criminal contempt jurisdiction.—

Juvenile court
criminal contempt jurisdiction was concurrent with district courts
because (1) the legislative grant of jurisdiction to juvenile courts
did not use the terms “exclusive” or “concurrent,”
(2) Wyo. Const. art. 5, § 10 granted district courts general criminal jurisdiction,
and (3) juvenile court jurisdiction was to be strictly construed. Brown v. State, 2017 WY 45, 393 P.3d 1265,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 2017).

Cited in

DB v. State (In re CRA), 2016 WY 24, 368 P.3d 294,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 2016).

§ 14-3-439.
Separate docket for juvenile cases; availability of records for statistics.

The clerk of the court shall maintain a separate docket for cases under this act and record therein the case number, the allegations of the petition, the age of the child involved and the disposition made. The records shall be made available for statistical purposes provided the names of the parties are not revealed.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-3-402(a)(xxiv).

§ 14-3-440.
Reasonable efforts for family reunification; exceptions.

Except as provided in W.S. 14-2-309(b) or (c), reasonable efforts shall be made to preserve and reunify the family:

Prior to placement of the child outside the home, to prevent or eliminate the need for removing the child from the child’s home; and

To make it possible for the child to safely return to the child’s home.

In determining what reasonable efforts shall be made with respect to a child and in making those reasonable efforts, the child’s health and safety shall be the paramount concern.

Reasonable efforts to place a child for adoption or with a legal guardian may be made concurrently with the reasonable efforts described in subsection (a) of this section.

If continuation of reasonable efforts described in subsection (a) of this section is determined to be inconsistent with the permanency plan for the child, reasonable efforts shall be made for placement of the child in a timely manner in accordance with the permanency plan, and to complete the steps necessary to finalize the permanent placement of the child.

Reasonable efforts determinations shall include whether or not services to the family have been accessible, available and appropriate.

The court shall make the reasonable efforts determinations required under this section at every court hearing. The reasonable efforts determinations shall be documented in the court’s orders.

If the court determines as provided in W.S. 14-2-309(a)(vi), (b) or (c) that reasonable efforts to preserve and reunify the family are not required:

A permanency hearing as provided in W.S. 14-3-431(e) shall be held for the child within thirty (30) days after the determination; and

Reasonable efforts shall be made to place the child in a timely manner in accordance with the permanency plan, and to complete whatever steps are necessary to finalize the permanent placement of the child.

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 201, § 2.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 61, § 1; 2005, ch. 201, §§ 1, 2; 2009, ch. 196, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted former (g)(i), providing for a permanency hearing if a court determined that reasonable effort to reunify a family were not required, redesignating former (g)(ii) as present (g); and repealed former (h), requiring a petition to terminate parental rights to be filed within 60 days of a judicial determination that reasonable efforts to reunify a family were not required.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, redesignated former (g) as (g)(ii); and added the present introductory language in (g) and (g)(i).

Aggravating circumstances not shown.—

Juvenile court abused its discretion by concluding the State had proven by clear and convincing evidence that aggravating circumstances existed that would make reunification between a father and a child unlikely because the facts did not establish severe misconduct toward child; the father was never charged with abuse or neglect of child, and he was taking drug tests and following the case plan so he could have visitation with the child. AA v. State, 2021 WY 18, 479 P.3d 1252,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 2021).

Construction.—

Reunification efforts are aimed at preventing removal of the child from the home or making it possible to return the child to his home, and this statutory language references a preexisting home and family. GS v. State (In the Interest of VS), 2018 WY 119, 429 P.3d 14,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 2018).

Proper efforts made.—

Department of Family Services made reasonable efforts to reunify the family for 20 months, without success; the department’s primary legal obligation was to reunify the existent family, which was with the mother, but she failed to comply with her case plan, and despite the father being in prison with a release date of 2022, the department tried to find a placement for the child within his family. The father had no relationship with the child, and it was in the child’s best interest to change the permanency plan to adoption.
GS v. State (In the Interest of VS), 2018 WY 119, 429 P.3d 14,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 2018).

Applicability. —

State was not required to show reasonable efforts to reunify the family in a parental rights termination proceeding where there was no requirement for reasonable efforts because the termination was sought on the basis that the children were left in the care of another for at least a year under and had been in foster care with the state for over fifteen of the last twenty-months. SLJ v. Dep't of Family Servs.(In re SJJ), 2005 WY 3, 104 P.3d 74,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 2005).

It was not an abuse of discretion to alter a father’s sons’ permanency plan from reunification to termination of parental rights and adoption because sufficient evidence showed the Wyoming Department of Family Services (DFS) made reasonable reunification efforts, but those efforts were unsuccessful when the father (1) refused to cooperate with DFS or utilize rehabilitation programs available to the father while incarcerated, (2) engaged in misconduct limiting the father’s ability to have contact with the sons, and (3) then communicated with the sons only sporadically. TW v. State (In re JW), 2018 WY 22, 411 P.3d 422,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2018).

§ 14-3-441.
Confidentiality in court proceedings.

In the event a confidentiality order has been entered pursuant to W.S.

35-21-112

or any other court order allowing a party to maintain confidentiality of addresses or other information identifying the residence of the victim of domestic abuse, the address and city or state of residence and other information identifying the residence of the victim of domestic abuse and any child residing with the victim of domestic abuse shall remain confidential in any court proceedings under this title.

History.

2013 ch. 98, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2013, ch. 98, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2013.

Cited in

RM v. State (In re JM), 2014 WY 114,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Sept. 16, 2014); DB v. State (In re CRA), 2016 WY 24, 368 P.3d 294,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 2016).